Hawaii statutes.
[§431:31-104] Authority of vendors.
(a) The employees and authorized representatives of vendors may sell or offer
portable electronics insurance to customers and shall not be subject to
licensure as an insurance producer under this chapter, provided that:

(1) The vendor obtains a limited lines license to
authorize its employees or authorized representatives to sell or offer portable
electronics insurance pursuant to this section;

(2) The insurer issuing the portable electronics
insurance either directly supervises or appoints a supervising entity to
supervise the administration of a portable electronics insurance program,
including development of a training program for employees and authorized
representatives of the vendors. The training shall comply with the following:

(A) The training shall be delivered to
employees and authorized representatives of a vendor who are directly engaged
in the activity of selling or offering portable electronics insurance;

(B) The training may be provided in electronic
form; provided that, if the training is conducted in an electronic form, the
supervising entity shall implement a supplemental education program regarding
the portable electronics insurance product that is conducted and overseen by a
licensed employee of the supervising entity; and

(C) Each employee and authorized
representative shall receive basic instruction about the portable electronics
insurance offered to customers and the disclosures required under section
431:31-103; and

(3) No employee or authorized representative of a
vendor shall advertise, represent, or otherwise portray the employee or
representative as a non-limited lines licensed insurance producer.

(b) The charges for portable electronics
insurance coverage may be billed and collected by the vendor. Any charge to
the enrolled customer for coverage that is not included in the cost associated
with the purchase or lease of portable electronics or related services shall be
separately itemized on the enrolled customer's bill. If the portable
electronics insurance coverage is included with the purchase or lease of
portable electronics or related services, the vendor shall clearly and
conspicuously disclose to the enrolled customer that the portable electronics
insurance coverage is included with the purchase or lease of portable
electronics or related services. Vendors billing and collecting the charges
shall not be required to maintain the funds in a segregated account; provided
that the vendor is authorized by the insurer to hold the funds in an
alternative manner and remits the amounts to the supervising entity within
sixty days of receipt. All funds received by a vendor from an enrolled
customer for the sale of portable electronics insurance shall be considered
funds held in trust by the vendor in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of
the insurer. Vendors may receive compensation for billing and collection
services. [L 2012, c 321, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next